District of Columbia statutes.
47-1049

Lowell School, lot 80, in square 2745-F.

The property located in the District of Columbia described as lot 80 in square 2745-F, together with the improvements thereon, situated at 1626, 1630, 1636, 1638, and 1640 Kalmia Road, N.W., and 7775 17th Street, N.W., owned, occupied, and used by the Lowell School, Inc., are hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is used in carrying on the purposes and activities of the Lowell School, Inc., and not used for commercial purposes, and subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

Sept. 10, 1999, D.C. Law 13-24, § 2(b), 46 DCR 5309